Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 807 (2) 91 lh/ko/md H.F. 807 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135S.1 Title. 1 This chapter shall be known as the âCompassion and Care for 2 Medically Challenging Pregnancies Actâ . 3 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 135S.2 Definitions. 4 For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context 5 otherwise requires: 6 1. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human 7 services. 8 2. âHealth care practitionerâ means a physician licensed 9 pursuant to chapter 148, a physician assistant licensed 10 pursuant to chapter 148C, an advanced registered nurse 11 practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 152, or an advanced 12 practice registered nurse under chapter 152E. 13 3. âLethal fetal anomalyâ means a fetal condition diagnosed 14 before birth that will, with reasonable certainty, result in 15 the death of the child three months after birth. 16 4. âPerinatal hospice serviceâ means comprehensive 17 support to a pregnant woman and her family that includes 18 support from the time of diagnosis of a lethal fetal anomaly, 19 through the time of birth and the death of the infant, and 20 through the postpartum period. âPerinatal hospice servicesâ 21 may include but are not limited to counseling and medical 22 care by maternal-fetal medical specialists, obstetricians, 23 neonatologists, anesthesia specialists, clergy, social workers, 24 and specialty nurses focused on alleviating fear and ensuring 25 that the pregnant woman and her family experience the life and 26 death of the child in a comfortable and supportive environment. 27 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 135S.3 Perinatal hospice services ââ 28 health care practitioner role ââ list and information. 29 1. A health care practitioner who diagnoses a lethal fetal 30 anomaly may do any of the following: 31 a. Inform the pregnant woman, orally and in person, that 32 perinatal hospice services are available and offer to refer the 33 pregnant woman for such services. 34 b. Provide the pregnant woman with the list and information 35 -1- HF 807 (2) 91 lh/ko/md 1/ 2 H.F. 807 sheet regarding available perinatal hospice services compiled 1 and provided by the department pursuant to subsection 2. 2 2. a. The department shall compile a geographically 3 organized list of, and an information sheet regarding, 4 perinatal hospice services available in Iowa and nationally. 5 b. The department shall post the list and information sheet 6 compiled under this subsection, available in both English and 7 Spanish, on the departmentâs internet site. 8 c. The internet site and information sheet shall include all 9 of the following: 10 (1) A statement indicating that perinatal hospice services 11 are an innovative and compassionate model of support for a 12 pregnant woman who is informed that her baby has a lethal fetal 13 anomaly and chooses to continue her pregnancy. 14 (2) A general description of the perinatal hospice services 15 available. 16 (3) At the request of a perinatal hospice service included 17 on the list, the perinatal hospice serviceâs informational 18 materials and contact information, including whether 19 twenty-four-hour perinatal hospice services are available. 20 -2- HF 807 (2) 91 lh/ko/md 2/ 2